Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB42.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) Sections 1 through 10, and amendments
thereto, shall be known and may be cited as the Kansas real time motor
vehicle insurance verification act.
(b) As used in this act:
(1) "Act" means the Kansas real time motor vehicle insurance
verification act.
(2) "Commercial vehicle coverage" means any coverage provided
to an insured, regardless of number of vehicles covered, under a
commercial coverage form and rated from a commercial manual
approved by the department.
(3) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of insurance.
(4) "Department" means the Kansas insurance department.
(5) "Insurance verification system" means the web-based system
for online verification of motor vehicle liability insurance.
(6) "KDOR" means the Kansas department of revenue.
New Sec. 2. (a) The commissioner shall establish a web-based
system for online verification of motor vehicle insurance and require
motor vehicle insurers to establish functionality for such system, as
specified in this act. Implementation of the insurance verification
system, including any exceptions as provided for in this act, supersedes
any existing motor vehicle liability insurance verification system
requirements and shall be the sole electronic system used for the
purpose of verifying motor vehicle liability insurance as required by the
laws of Kansas.
(b) The commissioner shall adopt such reasonable rules and
regulations as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act.
New Sec. 3. The insurance verification system shall:
(a) (1) Transmit requests to insurers for verification of motor
vehicle liability insurance via web services established by the insurers
in compliance with specifications and standards prescribed by the
commissioner in rules and regulations; and
(2) insurance company systems shall respond to each request for
verification of motor vehicle liability insurance with a prescribed
response upon evaluation of the data provided in such request;
(b) include appropriate provisions to secure its data against
unauthorized access in accordance with applicable data privacy
protection laws;
(c) be used for verification of motor vehicle liability insurance as
prescribed by the laws of Kansas and shall be accessible to authorized
personnel of the department, KDOR division of vehicles, the courts,
law enforcement agencies and other entities authorized by state or
federal privacy laws;
(d) be interfaced, wherever appropriate, with existing state
systems; and

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 2
(e) include information that shall enable authorized personnel to
make inquiries of insurers of motor vehicle liability insurance by using
multiple data elements for greater matching accuracy. Such information
shall be limited to:
(1) Insurer national association of insurance commissioners
company code number;
(2) vehicle identification number;
(3) policy number;
(4) verification date; or
(5) any other information required by the commissioner or KDOR
to operate the insurance verification system.
New Sec. 4. The commissioner may conduct a competitive bid
and contract with a private service provider that has successfully
implemented similar systems in other states to assist in establishing,
implementing and maintaining the insurance verification system.
New Sec. 5. The department shall provide funding for the
implementation, ongoing maintenance and enhancement of the
insurance verification system created by this act from the insurance
department regulation service fund, established under K.S.A. 40-112,
and amendments thereto.
New Sec. 6. (a) Insurers shall cooperate with the commissioner
and KDOR in establishing and maintaining the insurance verification
system and provide motor vehicle insurance policy status information
as provided in rules and regulations established by the commissioner.
(b) Insurer systems shall be permitted reasonable system
downtime for maintenance and other work with advance notice to
KDOR. Insurers shall not be subject to enforcement fees or other
penalties under such circumstances or when systems are unavailable
because of emergency, outside attack or other unexpected outages not
planned by the insurer and that are reasonably outside its control as
determined by KDOR.
(c) Each property and casualty insurance company that is licensed
to issue motor vehicle liability insurance or is authorized to do business
in Kansas shall provide verification of liability insurance for every
motor vehicle insured in Kansas by such company as required by this
act.
(d) This act shall not apply to vehicles insured under commercial
motor vehicle coverage, except that insurers of such vehicles may
participate on a voluntary basis.
(e) Insurers shall not be required to verify evidence of insurance
for vehicles registered in other jurisdictions.
(f) Insurers shall be immune from civil and administrative liability
for good faith efforts to comply with the terms of this act.
(g) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from using the
services of a third-party vendor to facilitate the insurance verification
program required by this act.
New Sec. 7. The commissioner may establish, through rules and
regulations, an alternative method for verifying motor vehicle liability
insurance for insurers that insure 1,000 or fewer vehicles within
Kansas.
New Sec. 8. All information and data provided by insurance
companies to the insurance verification system, and all reports,
responses or other information generated for the purposes of the
insurance verification system shall be confidential by law and
privileged, shall not be subject to the open records act, K.S.A. 45-215,
and amendments thereto, and shall not be subject to discovery or
admissible as evidence in any private civil action.
New Sec. 9. The insurance verification system shall be fully
operational not later than July 1, 2026, following an appropriate testing

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 3
period of not less than nine months. No enforcement action shall be
taken based on information obtained from the insurance verification
system until such system has successfully completed the testing period.
New Sec. 10. Establishing compliance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 40-3104, and amendments thereto, through the insurance
verification system shall not be the primary cause for law enforcement
to stop a vehicle.
Sec. 11. K.S.A. 8-173 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
173. (a) An application for registration of a vehicle as provided in
article 1 of chapter 8 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and
amendments thereto, shall not be accepted unless the person making
such application shall exhibit:
(1) A receipt showing that such person has paid all personal
property taxes levied against such person for the preceding year,
including taxes upon such vehicle, except that if such application is
made before May 11, such receipt need show payment of only one-half
1/ the preceding year's tax; or
2
(2) evidence that such vehicle was assessed for taxation purposes
by a state agency, or was assessed as stock in trade of a merchant or
manufacturer or was exempt from taxation under the laws of this state.
(b) An application for registration of a vehicle as provided in
article 1 of chapter 8 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and
amendments thereto, shall not be accepted if the records of the county
treasurer show that the applicant is delinquent and owes personal
property taxes levied against the applicant for any preceding year.
(c) An original application for registration of a motor vehicle shall
not be accepted until the applicant signs a certification, provided by the
director of motor vehicles, certifying that the applicant has and will
maintain, during the period of registration, the required insurance, self-
insurance or other financial security required pursuant to K.S.A. 40-
3104, and amendments thereto.
(d) An application for registration or renewal of registration of a
vehicle shall not be accepted if the applicant is unable to provide proof
of the insurance, self-insurance or other financial security required by
article 31 of chapter 40 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and
amendments thereto. Proof of insurance shall be verified by
examination of the insurance card or other documentation issued by an
insurance company, a certificate of self-insurance issued by the
commissioner, a binder of insurance, a certificate of insurance, a motor
carrier identification number issued by the state corporation
commission, proof of insurance for vehicles covered under a fleet
policy, a commercial policy covering more than one vehicle or a policy
of insurance required by K.S.A. 40-3104, and amendments thereto, and
for vehicles used as part of a drivers education program, a dealership
contract and a copy of a motor vehicle liability insurance policy issued
to a school district or accredited nonpublic school. Examination of a
photocopy, facsimile or an image displayed on a cellular phone or any
other type of portable electronic device of any of these documents shall
suffice for verification of registration or renewal. Any person to whom
such image of proof of insurance, self-insurance or other financial
security required by article 31 of chapter 40 of the Kansas Statutes
Annotated, and amendments thereto, is displayed, shall view only such
image displayed on such cellular phone or other portable electronic
device. Such person shall be prohibited from viewing any other content
or information stored on such cellular phone or other portable
electronic device. Proof of insurance may also be verified on-line
online or electronically, in accordance with the provisions of the
Kansas real time insurance verification act and sections 1 through 9,
and amendments thereto, and the commissioner of insurance may

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 4
require, by duly adopted rules and regulations, any motor vehicle
liability insurance company authorized to do business in this state to
provide verification of insurance in that manner. Any motor vehicle
liability insurance company which is providing verification of
insurance on-line or electronically on the day preceding the effective
date of this act may continue to do so in the same manner and shall be
deemed to be in compliance with this section.
(e) On and after January 1, 2018, An application for registration or
renewal of registration of a vehicle shall not be accepted, if the records
of the division show that after three attempts by the Kansas turnpike
authority to contact the registered owner, including at least one
registered letter, the registered owner of such vehicle has unpaid tolls
and that the director of the Kansas turnpike authority or the director's
designee has instructed the division to refuse to accept the registration
or renewal of registration, pursuant to K.S.A. 68-2020a, and
amendments thereto, unless the owner or registered owner makes
payment to the county treasurer at the time of registration or renewal of
registration. Of such moneys collected, 15% shall be retained by the
county treasurer and the remainder shall be remitted to the Kansas
turnpike authority.
Sec. 12. K.S.A. 40-108 is hereby amended to read as follows: 40-
108. The commissioner of insurance shall make an annual report to the
governor of the general conduct and condition of the insurance
companies, including fraternal benefit societies, doing business in this
state. The commissioner of insurance shall make an annual report of
the general conduct and condition of the insurance companies,
including fraternal benefit societies, doing business in this state and
shall publish such report on the department's website. The
commissioner of insurance shall keep and preserve in a permanent form
a full record of the commissioner's proceedings, including a concise
statement of the condition of each company reported, visited or
examined by the commissioner.
Sec. 13. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 40-2,125 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 40-2,125. (a) If the commissioner determines after notice and
opportunity for a hearing that any person has engaged or is engaging in
any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of Kansas
insurance statutes or any rule and regulation or order thereunder, the
commissioner may, in the exercise of discretion, order any one or more
of the following:
(1) Payment of a monetary penalty of not more than $1,000 for
each and every act or violation, unless the person knew or reasonably
should have known that such person was in violation of the Kansas
insurance statutes or any rule and regulation or order thereunder, in
which case the penalty shall be not more than $2,000 for each and
every act or violation;
(2) suspension or revocation of the person's license or certificate if
such person knew or reasonably should have known that such person
was in violation of the Kansas insurance statutes or any rule and
regulation or order thereunder; or
(3) that such person cease and desist from the unlawful act or
practice and take such affirmative action as that, in the judgment of the
commissioner, will carry out the purposes of the violated or potentially
violated provision.
(b) If any person fails to file any report or other information with
the commissioner as required by statute or fails to respond to any
proper inquiry of the commissioner, the commissioner, after notice and
opportunity for hearing, may impose a civil penalty of up to $1,000, for
each violation or act, along with an additional penalty of up to $500 for
each week thereafter that such report or other information is not

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 5
provided to the commissioner.
(c) If the commissioner makes written findings of fact that there is
a situation involving an immediate danger to the public health, safety or
welfare or the public interest will be irreparably harmed by delay in
issuing an order under subsection (a)(3), the commissioner may issue
an emergency temporary cease and desist order. Such order, even when
not an order within the meaning of K.S.A. 77-502, and amendments
thereto, shall be subject to the same procedures as an emergency order
issued under K.S.A. 77-536, and amendments thereto. Upon the entry
of such an order, the commissioner shall promptly notify the person
subject to the order that: (1) It Such order has been entered; (2) the
reasons therefor; and (3) that upon written request within 15 days after
service of the order, the matter will be set for a hearing, which shall be
conducted in accordance with the provisions of the Kansas
administrative procedure act. If no hearing is requested and none is
ordered by the commissioner, the order will remain in effect until it is
modified or vacated by the commissioner. If a hearing is requested or
ordered, the commissioner, after notice of and opportunity for hearing
to the person subject to the order, shall, by written findings of fact and
conclusions of law vacate, modify or make permanent the order.
(d) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Person" means any individual, corporation, association,
partnership, reciprocal exchange, inter-insurer, Lloyd's insurer, fraternal
benefit society and any other legal entity engaged in the business of
insurance, rating organization, third party administrator, nonprofit
dental service corporation, nonprofit medical and hospital service
corporation, automobile club, premium financing company, health
maintenance organization, insurance holding company, mortgage
guaranty insurance company, risk retention or purchasing group,
prepaid legal and dental service plan, captive insurance company,
automobile self-insurer or reinsurance intermediary and any other legal
entity under the jurisdiction of the commissioner. The term "person"
does not include insurance agents and brokers as such terms are defined
in K.S.A. 40-4902, and amendments thereto.
(2) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of insurance of this
state.
Sec. 14. On and after January 1, 2026, K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 40-1137
is hereby amended to read as follows: 40-1137. A title insurance agent
may operate as an escrow, settlement or closing agent, provided that:
(a) All funds deposited with the title insurance agent in connection
with an escrow, settlement or closing shall be submitted for collection
to, invested in or deposited in a separate fiduciary trust account or
accounts in a qualified financial institution no later than the close of the
next business day, in accordance with the following requirements:
(1) The funds shall be the property of the person or persons
entitled to them under the provisions of the escrow, settlement or
closing agreement and shall be segregated for each depository by
escrow, settlement or closing in the records of the title insurance agent
in a manner that permits the funds to be identified on an individual
basis;
(2) the funds shall be applied only in accordance with the terms of
the individual instructions or agreements under which the funds were
accepted; and
(3) an agent shall not retain any interest on any money held in an
interest-bearing account without the written consent of all parties to the
transaction.
(b) Funds held in an escrow account shall be disbursed only:
(1) Pursuant to written authorization of buyer and seller;
(2) pursuant to a court order; or

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 6
(3) when a transaction is closed according to the agreement of the
parties.
(c) A title insurance agent shall not commingle the agent's
personal funds or other moneys with escrow funds. In addition, the
agent shall not use escrow funds to pay or to indemnify against the
debts of the agent or of any other party. The escrow funds shall be used
only to fulfill the terms of the individual escrow and none of the funds
shall be utilized until the necessary conditions of the escrow have been
met. All funds deposited for real estate closings, including closings
involving refinances of existing mortgage loans, which exceed $2,500
shall be in one of the following forms:
(1) Lawful money of the United States;
(2) wire transfers such that the funds are unconditionally received
by the title insurance agent or the agent's depository;
(3) cashier's checks, certified checks, teller's checks or bank
money orders issued by a federally insured financial institution and
unconditionally held by the title insurance agent;
(4) funds received from governmental entities, federally chartered
instrumentalities of the United States or drawn on an escrow account of
a real estate broker licensed in the state or drawn on an escrow account
of a title insurer or title insurance agent licensed to do business in the
state;
(5) other negotiable instruments that have been on deposit in the
escrow account at least 10 days; or
(6) a real-time or instant payment through the FedNow service
operated by the federal reserve banks or the clearing house payment
company's real-time payments (RTP) system.
(d) Each title insurance agent shall have an annual audit made of
its escrow, settlement and closing deposit accounts, conducted by a
certified public accountant or by a title insurer for which the title
insurance agent has a licensing agreement. The title insurance agent
shall provide a copy of the audit report to the commissioner within 30
days after the close of the calendar year for which an audit is required
upon request. Title insurance agents who are attorneys and who issue
title insurance policies as part of their legal representation of clients are
exempt from the requirements of this subsection. However, the title
insurer, at its expense, may conduct or cause to be conducted an annual
audit of the escrow, settlement and closing accounts of the attorney.
Attorneys who are exclusively in the business of title insurance are not
exempt from the requirements of this subsection.
(e) The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations
setting forth the standards of the audit and the form of audit report
required.
(f) If the title insurance agent is appointed by two or more title
insurers and maintains fiduciary trust accounts in connection with
providing escrow and closing settlement services, the title insurance
agent shall allow each title insurer reasonable access to the accounts
and any or all of the supporting account information in order to
ascertain the safety and security of the funds held by the title insurance
agent.
(g) Nothing in this section is intended to amend, alter or supersede
other laws of this state or the United States, regarding an escrow
holder's duties and obligations.
Sec. 15. On and after January 1, 2026, K.S.A. 40-1139 is hereby
amended to read as follows: 40-1139. (a) The A title insurance agent
who that handles escrow, settlement or closing accounts shall file with
the commissioner a $100,000 surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit
in a form acceptable to the commissioner,. Such surety bond or
irrevocable letter of credit shall be issued by an insurance company or

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 7
financial institution that is authorized to conduct business in this state,
securing the applicant's or the title insurance agent's faithful
performance of all duties and obligations set out in K.S.A. 40-1135
through 40-1141, and amendments thereto.
(b) The terms of the bond or irrevocable letter of credit shall be:
(1) The surety bond shall provide that such bond may not be
terminated without 30 days prior written notice to the commissioner.
(2) An(c) The irrevocable letter of credit shall:
(1) Be issued by a bank which that is insured by the federal
deposit insurance corporation or its successor if such letter of credit is ;
and
(2) initially be issued for a term of at least one year and by its
terms is automatically renewed at each expiration date for at least an
additional one-year term unless at least 30 days prior written notice of
intention not to renew is given provided to the commissioner of
insurance.
(c) The amount of the surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit
for those agents servicing real estate transactions on property located in
counties having a certain population shall be required as follows:
(1) $100,000 surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit in counties
having a population of 40,001 and over;
(2) $50,000 surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit in counties
having a population of 20,001 to 40,000; and
(3) $25,000 surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit in counties
having a population of 20,000 or under.
(d) The surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit shall be for the
benefit of any person suffering a loss if the title insurance agent
converts or misappropriates money received or held in escrow, deposit
or trust accounts while acting as a title insurance agent providing any
escrow or settlement services.
Sec. 16. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 40-2404 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 40-2404. The following are hereby defined as unfair methods
of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the business
of insurance:
(1) Misrepresentations and false advertising of insurance policies.
Making, issuing, circulating or causing to be made, issued or circulated,
any estimate, illustration, circular, statement, sales presentation,
omission or comparison that:
(a) Misrepresents the benefits, advantages, conditions or terms of
any insurance policy;
(b) misrepresents the dividends or share of the surplus to be
received on any insurance policy;
(c) makes any false or misleading statements as to the dividends or
share of surplus previously paid on any insurance policy;
(d) is misleading or is a misrepresentation as to the financial
condition of any person, or as to the legal reserve system upon which
any life insurer operates;
(e) uses any name or title of any insurance policy or class of
insurance policies misrepresenting the true nature thereof;
(f) is a misrepresentation for the purpose of inducing or tending to
induce the lapse, forfeiture, exchange, conversion or surrender of any
insurance policy;
(g) is a misrepresentation for the purpose of effecting a pledge or
assignment of or effecting a loan against any insurance policy; or
(h) misrepresents any insurance policy as being shares of stock.
(2) False information and advertising generally. Making,
publishing, disseminating, circulating or placing before the public, or
causing, directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated,
circulated or placed before the public, in a newspaper, magazine or

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 8
other publication, or in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter or
poster, or over any radio or television station, or in any other way, an
advertisement, announcement or statement containing any assertion,
misrepresentation or statement with respect to the business of insurance
or with respect to any person in the conduct of such person's insurance
business, that is untrue, deceptive or misleading.
(3) Defamation. Making, publishing, disseminating or circulating,
directly or indirectly, or aiding, abetting or encouraging the making,
publishing, disseminating or circulating of any oral or written statement
or any pamphlet, circular, article or literature that is false, or
maliciously critical of or derogatory to the financial condition of any
person, and that is calculated to injure such person.
(4) Boycott, coercion and intimidation. Entering into any
agreement to commit, or by any concerted action committing, any act
of boycott, coercion or intimidation resulting in or tending to result in
unreasonable restraint of the business of insurance, or by any act of
boycott, coercion or intimidation monopolizing or attempting to
monopolize any part of the business of insurance.
(5) False statements and entries. (a) Knowingly filing with any
supervisory or other public official, or knowingly making, publishing,
disseminating, circulating or delivering to any person, or placing before
the public, or knowingly causing directly or indirectly, to be made,
published, disseminated, circulated, delivered to any person, or placed
before the public, any false material statement of fact as to the financial
condition of a person.
(b) Knowingly making any false entry of a material fact in any
book, report or statement of any person or knowingly omitting to make
a true entry of any material fact pertaining to the business of such
person in any book, report or statement of such person.
(6) Stock operations and advisory board contracts. Issuing or
delivering or permitting agents, officers or employees to issue or
deliver, agency company stock or other capital stock, or benefit
certificates or shares in any common-law corporation, or securities or
any special or advisory board contracts or other contracts of any kind
promising returns and profits as an inducement to insurance. Nothing
herein shall prohibit the acts permitted by K.S.A. 40-232, and
amendments thereto.
(7) Unfair discrimination. (a) Making or permitting any unfair
discrimination between individuals of the same class and equal
expectation of life in the rates charged for any contract of life insurance
or life annuity or in the dividends or other benefits payable thereon, or
in any other of the terms and conditions of such contract.
(b) Making or permitting any unfair discrimination between
individuals of the same class and of essentially the same hazard in the
amount of premium, policy fees or rates charged for any policy or
contract of accident or health insurance or in the benefits payable
thereunder, or in any of the terms or conditions of such contract, or in
any other manner whatever.
(c) Refusing to insure, or refusing to continue to insure, or limiting
the amount, extent or kind of coverage available to an individual, or
charging an individual a different rate for the same coverage solely
because of blindness or partial blindness. With respect to all other
conditions, including the underlying cause of the blindness or partial
blindness, persons who are blind or partially blind shall be subject to
the same standards of sound actuarial principles or actual or reasonably
anticipated experience as are sighted persons. Refusal to insure
includes denial by an insurer of disability insurance coverage on the
grounds that the policy defines "disability" as being presumed in the
event that the insured loses such person's eyesight. However, an insurer

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 9
may exclude from coverage disabilities consisting solely of blindness
or partial blindness when such condition existed at the time the policy
was issued.
(d) Refusing to insure, or refusing to continue to insure, or
limiting the amount, extent or kind of coverage available for accident
and health and life insurance to an applicant who is the proposed
insured or charge, charging a different rate for the same coverage or,
excluding or limiting coverage for losses or denying a claim incurred
by an insured as a result of abuse based on the fact that the applicant
who, is the proposed insured, is, has been, or may be the subject of
domestic abuse, except as provided in subsection (7)(d)(v). "Abuse" As
used in this paragraph, "abuse" means one or more acts defined in
K.S.A. 60-3102, and amendments thereto, between family members,
current or former household members, or current or former intimate
partners.
(i) An insurer may shall not ask an applicant for life or accident
and health insurance who is the proposed insured if the individual is,
has been or may be the subject of domestic abuse, or seeks, has sought
or had reason to seek medical or psychological treatment or counseling
specifically for abuse, protection from abuse or shelter from abuse.
(ii) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person
from declining to issue an insurance policy insuring the life of an
individual who is, has been or has the potential to be the subject of
abuse if the perpetrator of the abuse is the applicant or would be the
owner of the insurance policy.
(iii) No insurer that issues a life or accident and health policy to an
individual who is, has been or may be the subject of domestic abuse
shall be subject to civil or criminal liability for the death or any injuries
suffered by that individual as a result of domestic abuse.
(iv) No person shall refuse to insure, refuse to continue to insure,
limit the amount, extent or kind of coverage available to an individual
or charge a different rate for the same coverage solely because of
physical or mental condition, except where the refusal, limitation or
rate differential is based on sound actuarial principles.
(v) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person
from underwriting or rating a risk on the basis of a preexisting physical
or mental condition, even if such condition has been caused by abuse,
provided that:
(A) The person routinely underwrites or rates such condition in
the same manner with respect to an insured or an applicant who is not a
victim of abuse;
(B) the fact that an individual is, has been or may be the subject of
abuse may not be considered a physical or mental condition; and
(C) such underwriting or rating is not used to evade the intent of
this section or any other provision of the Kansas insurance code.
(vi) Any person who underwrites or rates a risk on the basis of
preexisting physical or mental condition as set forth in subsection (7)
(d)(v), shall treat such underwriting or rating as an adverse
underwriting decision pursuant to K.S.A. 40-2,112, and amendments
thereto.
(vii) The provisions of this paragraph shall apply to all policies of
life and accident and health insurance issued in this state after the
effective date of this act and all existing contracts that are renewed on
or after the effective date of this act.
(e) Refusing to insure, or refusing to continue to insure, or limiting
the amount, extent or kind of coverage available for life insurance to an
individual, or charging an individual a different rate for the same
coverage, solely because of such individual's status as a living organ
donor. With respect to all other conditions, persons who are living

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 10
organ donors shall be subject to the same standards of sound actuarial
principles or actual or reasonably anticipated experience as are persons
who are not organ donors.
(8) Rebates. (a) Except as otherwise expressly provided by law,
knowingly permitting, offering to make or making any contract of life
insurance, life annuity or accident and health insurance, or agreement
as to such contract other than as plainly expressed in the insurance
contract issued thereon; paying, allowing, giving or offering to pay,
allow or give, directly or indirectly, as inducement to such insurance, or
annuity, any rebate of premiums payable on the contract, any special
favor or advantage in the dividends or other benefits thereon, or any
valuable consideration or inducement whatever not specified in the
contract; or giving, selling, purchasing or offering to give, sell or
purchase as inducement to such insurance contract or annuity or in
connection therewith, any stocks, bonds or other securities of any
insurance company or other corporation, association or partnership, or
any dividends or profits accrued thereon, or anything of value
whatsoever not specified in the contract.
(b) Nothing in subsection (7)(a) or (8)(a) shall be construed as
including within the definition of discrimination or rebates any of the
following practices:
(i) In the case of any contract of life insurance or life annuity,
paying bonuses to policyholders or otherwise abating their premiums in
whole or in part out of surplus accumulated from nonparticipating
insurance. Any such bonuses or abatement of premiums shall be fair
and equitable to policyholders and for the best interests of the company
and its policyholders;
(ii) in the case of life insurance policies issued on the industrial
debit plan, making allowance to policyholders who have continuously
for a specified period made premium payments directly to an office of
the insurer in an amount that fairly represents the saving in collection
expenses;
(iii) readjustment of the rate of premium for a group insurance
policy based on the loss or expense experience thereunder, at the end of
the first or any subsequent policy year of insurance thereunder, which
may be made retroactive only for such policy year;
(iv) engaging in an arrangement that would not violate section 106
of the bank holding company act amendments of 1972, as interpreted
by the board of governors of the federal reserve system or section 5(q)
of the home owners' loan act;
(v) the offer or provision by insurers or producers, by or through
employees, affiliates or third-party representatives, of value-added
products or services at no or reduced cost when such products or
services are not specified in the policy of insurance if the product or
service:
(A) Relates to the insurance coverage; and
(B) is primarily designed to satisfy one or more of the following:
(1) Provide loss mitigation or loss control;
(2) reduce claim costs or claim settlement costs;
(3) provide education about liability risks or risk of loss to persons
or property;
(4) monitor or assess risk, identify sources of risk or develop
strategies for eliminating or reducing risk;
(5) enhance health;
(6) enhance financial wellness through items such as education or
financial planning services;
(7) provide post-loss services;
(8) (a) incentivize behavioral changes to improve the health or
reduce the risk of death or disability of a customer;

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 11
(b) as used in this section, "customer" means a policyholder,
potential policyholder, certificate holder, potential certificate holder,
insured, potential insured or applicant; or
(9) assist in the administration of the employee or retiree benefit
insurance coverage.
(C) The cost to the insurer or producer offering the product or
service to any given customer shall be reasonable in comparison to
such customer's premiums or insurance coverage for the policy class.
(D) If the insurer or producer is providing the product or service
offered, the insurer or producer shall ensure that the customer is
provided with contact information, upon request, to assist the customer
with questions regarding the product or service.
(E) The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations when
implementing the permitted practices set forth in this section to ensure
consumer protection. Such rules and regulations, consistent with
applicable law, may address, among other issues, consumer data
protections and privacy, consumer disclosure and unfair discrimination.
(F) The availability of the value-added product or service shall be
based on documented objective criteria and offered in a manner that is
not unfairly discriminatory. The documented criteria shall be
maintained by the insurer or producer and produced upon request by
the commissioner.
(G) (1) If an insurer or producer does not have sufficient evidence
but has a good-faith belief that the product or service meets the criteria
in subsection (8)(b)(v)(B), the insurer or producer may provide the
product or service in a manner that is not unfairly discriminatory as part
of a pilot or testing program for not more than one year. An insurer or
producer shall notify the commissioner of such a pilot or testing
program offered to consumers in this state prior to launching and may
proceed with the program unless the commissioner objects within 21
days of notice.
(2) If the insurer or producer is unable to determine sufficient
evidence within the one-year pilot or testing period, the insurer or
producer may request that such pilot or testing period be extended for
such additional time as necessary to determine if the product or service
meets the criteria described in subsection (8)(b)(v)(B). Upon such a
request, the commissioner may grant an extension of a specified time.
(vi) An insurer or a producer may:
(A) Offer or give non-cash gifts, items or services, including
meals to or charitable donations on behalf of a customer, in connection
with the marketing, sale, purchase or retention of contracts of
insurance, as long as the cost does not exceed an amount determined to
be reasonable by the commissioner per policy year per term. The offer
shall be made in a manner that is not unfairly discriminatory. The
customer shall not be required to purchase, continue to purchase or
renew a policy in exchange for the gift, item or service.
(B) Conduct raffles or drawings to the extent permitted by state
law, as long as there is no financial cost to entrants to participate, the
drawing or raffle does not obligate participants to purchase insurance,
the prizes are not valued in excess of a reasonable amount determined
by the commissioner and the drawing or raffle is open to the public.
The raffle or drawing shall be offered in a manner that is not unfairly
discriminatory. The customer shall not be required to purchase,
continue to purchase or renew a policy in exchange for the gift, item or
service.
(c) An insurer, producer or representative of an insurer or
producer shall not offer or provide insurance as an inducement to the
purchase of another policy.
(9) Unfair claim settlement practices. It is an unfair claim

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 12
settlement practice if any of the following or any rules and regulations
pertaining thereto are either committed flagrantly and in conscious
disregard of such provisions, or committed with such frequency as to
indicate a general business practice:
(a) Misrepresenting pertinent facts or insurance policy provisions
relating to coverages at issue;
(b) failing to acknowledge and act reasonably promptly upon
communications with respect to claims arising under insurance
policies;
(c) failing to adopt and implement reasonable standards for the
prompt investigation of claims arising under insurance policies;
(d) refusing to pay claims without conducting a reasonable
investigation based upon all available information;
(e) failing to affirm or deny coverage of claims within a
reasonable time after proof of loss statements have been completed;
(f) not attempting in good faith to effectuate prompt, fair and
equitable settlements of claims in which liability has become
reasonably clear;
(g) compelling insureds to institute litigation to recover amounts
due under an insurance policy by offering substantially less than the
amounts ultimately recovered in actions brought by such insureds;
(h) attempting to settle a claim for less than the amount to which a
reasonable person would have believed that such person was entitled by
reference to written or printed advertising material accompanying or
made part of an application;
(i) attempting to settle claims on the basis of an application that
was altered without notice to, or knowledge or consent of the insured;
(j) making claims payments to insureds or beneficiaries not
accompanied by a statement setting forth the coverage under which
payments are being made;
(k) making known to insureds or claimants a policy of appealing
from arbitration awards in favor of insureds or claimants for the
purpose of compelling them to accept settlements or compromises less
than the amount awarded in arbitration;
(l) delaying the investigation or payment of claims by requiring an
insured, claimant or the physician of either to submit a preliminary
claim report and then requiring the subsequent submission of formal
proof of loss forms, both of which submissions contain substantially
the same information;
(m) failing to promptly settle claims, where liability has become
reasonably clear, under one portion of the insurance policy coverage in
order to influence settlements under other portions of the insurance
policy coverage; or
(n) failing to promptly provide a reasonable explanation of the
basis in the insurance policy in relation to the facts or applicable law
for denial of a claim or for the offer of a compromise settlement.
(10) Failure to respond to an inquiry. An insurer's failing, upon
receipt of any inquiry from the insurance department concerning a
complaint or inquiry related to a particular matter, within 14 calendar
days of receipt of such inquiry to furnish the department with an
adequate response to such inquiry.
(10)(11) Failure to maintain complaint handling procedures.
Failure of any person, who is an insurer on an insurance policy, to
maintain a complete record of all the complaints that it has received
since the date of its last examination under K.S.A. 40-222, and
amendments thereto; but, except that no such records shall be required
for complaints received prior to the effective date of this act. The
record shall indicate the total number of complaints, their classification
by line of insurance, the nature of each complaint, the disposition of the

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 13
complaints, the date each complaint was originally received by the
insurer and the date of final disposition of each complaint. For purposes
of this subsection section, "complaint" means any written
communication primarily expressing a grievance related to the acts and
practices set out in this section.
(11)(12) Misrepresentation in insurance applications. Making
false or fraudulent statements or representations on or relative to an
application for an insurance policy, for the purpose of obtaining a fee,
commission, money or other benefit from any insurer, agent, broker or
individual.
(12)(13) Statutory violations. Any violation of any of the
provisions of K.S.A. 40-216, 40-276a, 40-2,155 or 40-1515, and
amendments thereto.
(13)(14) Disclosure of information relating to adverse
underwriting decisions and refund of premiums. Failing to comply with
the provisions of K.S.A. 40-2,112, and amendments thereto, within the
time prescribed in such section.
(14)(15) Rebates and other inducements in title insurance. (a) No
title insurance company or title insurance agent, or any officer,
employee, attorney, agent or solicitor thereof, may pay, allow or give,
or offer to pay, allow or give, directly or indirectly, as an inducement to
obtaining any title insurance business, any rebate, reduction or
abatement of any rate or charge made incident to the issuance of such
insurance, any special favor or advantage not generally available to
others of the same classification, or any money, thing of value or other
consideration or material inducement. The words "Charge made
incident to the issuance of such insurance" includes, without
limitations, escrow, settlement and closing charges.
(b) No insured named in a title insurance policy or contract nor
any other person directly or indirectly connected with the transaction
involving the issuance of the policy or contract, including, but not
limited to, mortgage lender, real estate broker, builder, attorney or any
officer, employee, agent representative or solicitor thereof, or any other
person may knowingly receive or accept, directly or indirectly, any
rebate, reduction or abatement of any charge, or any special favor or
advantage or any monetary consideration or inducement referred to in
subsection (14)(a) (15)(a).
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting:
(i) The payment of reasonable fees for services actually rendered
to a title insurance agent in connection with a title insurance
transaction;
(ii) the payment of an earned commission to a duly appointed title
insurance agent for services actually performed in the issuance of the
policy of title insurance; or
(iii) the payment of reasonable entertainment and advertising
expenses.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the division of rates and
charges between or among a title insurance company and its agent, or
one or more title insurance companies and one or more title insurance
agents, if such division of rates and charges does not constitute an
unlawful rebate under the provisions of this section and is not in
payment of a forwarding fee or a finder's fee.
(e) As used in subsections (14)(e) (15)(e) through (14)(i) (15)(i),
unless the context otherwise requires:
(i) "Associate" means any firm, association, organization,
partnership, business trust, corporation or other legal entity organized
for profit in which a producer of title business is a director, officer or
partner thereof, or owner of a financial interest;, the spouse or any
relative within the second degree by blood or marriage of a producer of

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 14
title business who is a natural person;, any director, officer or employee
of a producer of title business or associate;, any legal entity that
controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a producer
of title business or associate; and any natural person or legal entity with
whom a producer of title business or associate has any agreement,
arrangement or understanding or pursues any course of conduct, the
purpose or effect of which is to evade the provisions of this section.
(ii) "Financial interest" means any direct or indirect interest, legal
or beneficial, where the holder thereof is or will be entitled to 1% or
more of the net profits or net worth of the entity in which such interest
is held. Notwithstanding the foregoing, an interest of less than 1% or
any other type of interest shall constitute a "financial interest" if the
primary purpose of the acquisition or retention of that interest is the
financial benefit to be obtained as a consequence of that interest from
the referral of title business.
(iii) "Person" means any natural person, partnership, association,
cooperative, corporation, trust or other legal entity.
(iv) "Producer of title business" or "producer" means any person,
including any officer, director or owner of 5% or more of the equity or
capital or both of any person, engaged in this state in the trade,
business, occupation or profession of:
(A) Buying or selling interests in real property;
(B) making loans secured by interests in real property; or
(C) acting as broker, agent, representative or attorney for a person
who buys or sells any interest in real property or who lends or borrows
money with such interest as security.
(v) "Refer" means to direct or cause to be directed or to exercise
any power or influence over the direction of title insurance business,
whether or not the consent or approval of any other person is sought or
obtained with respect to the referral.
(f) No title insurer or title agent may accept any order for, issue a
title insurance policy to, or provide services to, an applicant if it knows
or has reason to believe that the applicant was referred to it by any
producer of title business or by any associate of such producer, where
the producer, the associate, or both, have a financial interest in the title
insurer or title agent to which business is referred unless the producer
has disclosed to the buyer, seller and lender the financial interest of the
producer of title business or associate referring the title insurance
business.
(g) (i) No title insurer or title agent may accept an order for title
insurance business, issue a title insurance policy, or receive or retain
any premium, or charge in connection with any transaction if: (i) (A)
The title insurer or title agent knows or has reason to believe that the
transaction will constitute controlled business for that title insurer or
title agent; and (ii) (B) 70% or more of the closed title orders of that
title insurer or title agent during the 12 full calendar months
immediately preceding the month in which the transaction takes place
is derived from controlled business. The prohibitions contained in this
paragraph shall not apply to transactions involving real estate located in
a county that has a population, as shown by the last preceding decennial
census, of 10,000 or less.
(ii) Paragraph (g) shall become effective on and after January 1,
2026.
(h) Within 90 days following the end of each business year, as
established by the title insurer or title agent, each title insurer or title
agent shall file with the department of insurance and any title insurer
with which the title agent maintains an underwriting agreement, a
report executed by the title insurer's or title agent's chief executive
officer or designee, under penalty of perjury, stating the percent of

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 15
closed title orders originating from controlled business. The failure of a
title insurer or title agent to comply with the requirements of this
section, at the discretion of the commissioner, shall be grounds for the
suspension or revocation of a license or other disciplinary action, with
the commissioner able to mitigate any such disciplinary action if the
title insurer or title agent is found to be in substantial compliance with
competitive behavior as defined by federal housing and urban
development statement of policy 1996-2.
(i) (1) No title insurer or title agent may accept any title insurance
order or issue a title insurance policy to any person if it knows or has
reason to believe that such person was referred to it by any producer of
title business or by any associate of such producer, where the producer,
the associate, or both, have a financial interest in the title insurer or title
agent to which business is referred unless the producer has disclosed in
writing to the person so referred the fact that such producer or associate
has a financial interest in the title insurer or title agent, the nature of the
financial interest and a written estimate of the charge or range of
charges generally made by the title insurer or agent for the title
services. Such disclosure shall include language stating that the
consumer is not obligated to use the title insurer or agent in which the
referring producer or associate has a financial interest and shall include
the names and telephone numbers of not less than three other title
insurers or agents that operate in the county in which the property is
located. If fewer than three insurers or agents operate in that county, the
disclosure shall include all title insurers or agents operating in that
county. Such written disclosure shall be signed by the person so
referred and must have occurred prior to any commitment having been
made to such title insurer or agent.
(2) No producer of title business or associate of such producer
shall require, directly or indirectly, as a condition to selling or
furnishing any other person any loan or extension thereof, credit, sale,
property, contract, lease or service, that such other person shall
purchase title insurance of any kind through any title agent or title
insurer if such producer has a financial interest in such title agent or
title insurer.
(3) No title insurer or title agent may accept any title insurance
order or issue a title insurance policy to any person it knows or has
reason to believe that the name of the title company was pre-printed in
the sales contract, prior to the buyer or seller selecting that title
company.
(4) Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit any producer of title
business or associate of such producer from referring title business to
any title insurer or title agent of such producer's or associate's choice,
and, if such producer or associate of such producer has any financial
interest in the title insurer, from receiving income, profits or dividends
produced or realized from such financial interest, so long as if:
(a) Such financial interest is disclosed to the purchaser of the title
insurance in accordance with paragraphs (i)(1) through (i)(4);
(b) the payment of income, profits or dividends is not in exchange
for the referral of business; and
(c) the receipt of income, profits or dividends constitutes only a
return on the investment of the producer or associate.
(5) Any producer of title business or associate of such producer
who violates the provisions of paragraphs (i)(2) through (i)(4), or any
title insurer or title agent who accepts an order for title insurance
knowing that it is in violation of paragraphs (i)(2) through (i)(4), in
addition to any other action that may be taken by the commissioner of
insurance, shall be subject to a fine by the commissioner in an amount
equal to five times the premium for the title insurance and, if licensed

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 16
pursuant to K.S.A. 58-3034 et seq., and amendments thereto, shall be
deemed to have committed a prohibited act pursuant to K.S.A. 58-
3602, and amendments thereto, and shall be liable to the purchaser of
such title insurance in an amount equal to the premium for the title
insurance.
(6) Any title insurer or title agent that is a competitor of any title
insurer or title agent that, subsequent to the effective date of this act,
has violated or is violating the provisions of this paragraph, shall have a
cause of action against such title insurer or title agent and, upon
establishing the existence of a violation of any such provision, shall be
entitled, in addition to any other damages or remedies provided by law,
to such equitable or injunctive relief as the court deems proper. In any
such action under this subsection, the court may award to the successful
party the court costs of the action together with reasonable attorney
fees.
(7) The commissioner shall also require each title agent to provide
core title services as required by the real estate settlement procedures
act.
(j) The commissioner shall adopt any rules and regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.
(15)(16) Disclosure of nonpublic personal information. (a) No
person shall disclose any nonpublic personal information contrary to
the provisions of title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley act of 1999 (,
public law 106-102). The commissioner may adopt rules and
regulations necessary to carry out this subsection. Such rules and
regulations shall be consistent with and not more restrictive than the
model regulation adopted on September 26, 2000, by the national
association of insurance commissioners entitled "Privacy of consumer
financial and health information regulation"."
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed or construed to
authorize the promulgation or adoption of any regulation that preempts,
supersedes or is inconsistent with any provision of Kansas law
concerning requirements for notification of, or obtaining consent from,
a parent, guardian or other legal custodian of a minor relating to any
matter pertaining to the health and medical treatment for such minor.
Sec. 17. K.S.A. 40-2253 is hereby amended to read as follows: 40-
2253. (a) The commissioner of insurance shall devise universal forms
to be utilized by every insurance company, including health
maintenance organizations where applicable, offering any type of
accident and sickness policy covering individuals residing in this state
for the purpose of receiving every claim under such policy by persons
covered thereunder. In the preparation of such forms, the commissioner
may confer with representatives of insurance companies, health
maintenance organizations, trade associations and other interested
parties. Upon completion and final adoption of such forms by the
commissioner, the commissioner shall notify those companies affected
by sending them a copy of such forms and an explanation of the
requirements of this section. Every such company shall implement
utilization of such forms not later than six months following the date of
the commissioner's notification.
(b) An accident and sickness insurer may not refuse to accept a
claim submitted on duly promulgated uniform claim forms. An insurer
may accept claims submitted on any other form.
(c) An accident and sickness insurer does not violate subsection
(a) by using a document that the accident and sickness insurer has been
required to use by the federal government or the state.
(d) The commissioner of insurance shall report to the governor
and to the legislature, no later than the commencement of the 1993
regular session of the Kansas legislature, regarding the development of

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 17
uniform electronic data interchange formats and standards, along with a
proposed plan, including an analysis of the cost impact thereof.
Sec. 18. K.S.A. 40-3807 is hereby amended to read as follows: 40-
3807. (a) All insurance charges, premiums, collateral and loss
reimbursements collected by an administrator on behalf of or for a
payor, and the return of premiums or collateral received from that
payor, shall be held by the administrator in a fiduciary capacity. Such
funds shall be immediately remitted to the person or persons entitled
thereto, or shall be deposited promptly in a fiduciary account
established and maintained by the administrator in a federally or state-
insured financial institution. A separate fiduciary account shall be
maintained by the administrator for each payor and shall not contain
funds collected or held by the administrator on behalf of multiple
payors. The written agreement between the administrator and the payor
shall provide for the administrator to periodically render an accounting
to the payor detailing all transactions performed by the administrator
pertaining to the business of the payor, and the written agreement
between the payor and the administrator shall include specifications of
this reporting.
(b) The administrator shall keep copies of all records of any
fiduciary account maintained or controlled by the administrator, and,
upon request of a payor, shall furnish the payor with copies of such
records pertaining to deposits and withdrawals on behalf of the payor.
If charges or premiums so deposited have been collected on behalf of
or for more than one payor, or for the payment of claims associated
with more than one policy, the administrator shall keep records clearly
recording the deposits in and withdrawals from the account on behalf
of each payor and relating to each policyholder.
(c) The administrator shall not pay any claim by withdrawals from
a fiduciary account in which premiums or charges are deposited.
Withdrawals from a fiduciary account shall be made as provided in the
written agreement between the administrator and the payor, and only
for the following purposes: (1) Remittance to an insurer entitled
thereto; (2) deposit in an account maintained in the name of the payor;
(3) transfer to and deposit in a claims paying account, with claims to be
paid as provided in subsection (d); (4) payment to a group policyholder
for remittance to the payor entitled thereto; (5) payment to the
administrator of its earned commissions, fees or charges; (6) remittance
of return premiums to the person or persons entitled thereto; or (7)
payment to other service providers as authorized by the payor.
(d) All claims paid by the administrator from funds collected on
behalf of or for a payor shall be paid only as authorized by the payor.
Payments from an account maintained or controlled by the
administrator may be made for the following purposes including the
payment of claims: (1) Payment of valid claims; (2) payment of
expenses associated with the handling of claims to the administrator or
to other service providers approved by the payor; (3) remittance to the
payor, or transfer to a successor administrator as directed by the payor,
for the purpose of paying claims and associated expenses; and (4)
return of funds held as collateral or prepayment, to the person entitled
to those funds, upon a determination by the payor that those funds are
no longer necessary to secure or facilitate the payment of claims and
associated expenses.
Sec. 19. K.S.A. 40-3809 is hereby amended to read as follows: 40-
3809. (a) Where the services of an administrator are utilized, the
administrator shall provide a written notice, approved by the payor, to
covered individuals advising them of the identity of and relationship
among the administrator, the policyholder and the payor.
(b) When an administrator collects funds, the reason for collection

SENATE BILL No. 42—page 18
of each item shall be identified to the insured party and each item shall
be shown separately from any premium. Additional charges may not be
made for services to the extent the services have already been paid for
by the payor.
(c) The administrator shall disclose to the payor all charges, fees
and commissions that the administrator receives arising from services it
provides for the payor, including any fees or commissions paid by
payors providing reinsurance or stop-loss insurance.
(d) An administrator shall disclose to the commissioner any
bankruptcy petition filed by or on behalf of such administrator
pursuant to chapter 9 or chapter 11 of the United States bankruptcy
code at the time such filing is made.
Sec. 20. K.S.A. 8-173, 40-108, 40-2253, 40-3807 and 40-3809 and
K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 40-2,125 and 40-2404 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 21. On and after January 1, 2026, K.S.A. 40-1139 and K.S.A.
2024 Supp. 40-1137 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 22. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
__________________________
SENATE adopted
________________
Conference Committee Report
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
as amended
HOUSE adopted
________________
Conference Committee Report
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
_____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.